Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1404
Medical care of genetically handicapping conditions; reimbursement.

Reimbursement under sections 68-1401 to 68-1406 shall be made to the extent services are not available or provided to the recipient under any other private, state, or federal programs or under other contractual or legal entitlement including insurance, but no provision in sections 68-1401 to 68-1406 shall be construed as limiting in any way state participation in any federal governmental program for medical care of persons with genetically handicapping conditions.

Laws 1980, LB 989, § 4.